Washington statutes.
RCW 39.50.070

Funds for payment of principal and interest.

For the purpose of providing funds for the payment of principal of and interest on short-term obligations, the governing body may authorize the creation of a special fund or funds and provide for the payment from authorized sources to such funds of amounts sufficient to meet principal and interest requirements.

[ 1982 c 216 s 8.]